Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. March 4th of each year is designated as HPV Awareness Day.
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 27, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4135 (HB 4135-INTRO) Page 2